Arkansas, session 2025, HB1087.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OIL AND GAS COMMISSION. There is hereby
established for the Department of Energy and Environment - Oil and Gas
Commission for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of
regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U045U OIL & GAS DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE01
(2) D015C STATE NETWORK ENGINEER 1 GRADE IT07
(3) D040C GIS ANALYST 1 GRADE IT06
(4) D052C SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE IT05
*WFP011*
01/06/2025 4:25:23 PM WFP011

HB1087
(5) D071C COMPUTER SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE IT03
(6) G032C E&E ENERGY OPERATIONS MANAGER 2 GRADE GS12
(7) B014N SENIOR PETROLEUM GEOLOGIST 3 GRADE GS11
(8) G076C ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(9) G063C E&E BRANCH MANAGER 2 GRADE GS10
(10) B050C E&E INSPECTOR SUPERVISOR II 1 GRADE GS08
(11) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 3 GRADE GS06
(12) X082C E&E INSPECTOR II 9 GRADE GS06
(13) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 4 GRADE GS04
(14) X098C OIL & GAS TECHNICIAN 1 GRADE GS04
(15) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 2 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 33

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OIL AND GAS COMMISSION. There is hereby
authorized, for the Department of Energy and Environment - Oil and Gas
Commission for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of
part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from
funds appropriated herein for such purposes: six (6) temporary or part-time
employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act
for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OIL AND GAS COMMISSION - OPERATIONS. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy and Environment, to be
payable from the Oil and Gas Commission Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Energy and Environment - Oil and Gas
Commission - Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,910,320
(02) EXTRA HELP 60,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 705,017
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 887,197
01/06/2025 4:25:23 PM WFP011

HB1087
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 40,000
(C) PROF. FEES 25,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 200,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) POLLUTION CONTROL 275,000
(06) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 100,000
(07) DATA PROCESSING SERVICES 348,217
(08) INTERSTATE OIL COMPACT 35,000
(09) UNDERGROUND INJECTION CONTROL 100,000
(10) GROUNDWATER PROTECTION 12,500
(11) ENERGY EDUCATION 30,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $4,728,251

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - OIL AND GAS COMMISSION - REFUNDS AND
REIMBURSEMENTS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy
and Environment, to be payable from cash funds as defined by Arkansas Code
§19-4-801, for refunds and reimbursements of the Department of Energy and
Environment - Oil and Gas Commission - Refunds and Reimbursements for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS $200,000

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - OIL AND GAS COMMISSION - WELL PLUGGING
PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy and
Environment, to be payable from the Abandoned and Orphaned Well Plugging
Fund, for well plugging program expenses of the Department of Energy and
Environment - Oil and Gas Commission - Well Plugging Program for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) WELL PLUGGING EXPENSES $12,500,000

SECTION 6. REGULAR SALARIES - OFFICE OF THE STATE GEOLOGIST. There is
01/06/2025 4:25:23 PM WFP011

HB1087
hereby established for the Department of Energy and Environment - Office of
the State Geologist for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum
number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U039U STATE GEOLOGIST 1 GRADE SE01
(2) D040C GIS ANALYST 1 GRADE IT06
(3) D044C SYSTEMS ANALYST 1 GRADE IT05
(4) D062C DATABASE ANALYST 1 GRADE IT04
(5) D078C GIS TECHNICIAN 2 GRADE IT02
(6) B013N ASST STATE GEOLOGIST 1 GRADE GS12
(7) B014N SENIOR PETROLEUM GEOLOGIST 1 GRADE GS11
(8) B035C GEOLOGY SUPERVISOR 5 GRADE GS09
(9) B043C PROFESSIONAL GEOLOGIST 4 GRADE GS08
(10) B051C GEOLOGIST 1 GRADE GS07
(11) C022C BUSINESS OPERATIONS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
(12) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 20

SECTION 7. EXTRA HELP - OFFICE OF THE STATE GEOLOGIST. There is hereby
authorized, for the Department of Energy and Environment - Office of the
State Geologist for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number
of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable
from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: eight (8) temporary or
part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those
provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its
successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - OFFICE OF THE STATE GEOLOGIST - OPERATIONS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy and Environment, to
be payable from the Oil and Gas Commission Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Energy and Environment - Office of
the State Geologist - Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
01/06/2025 4:25:23 PM WFP011

HB1087
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,199,871
(02) EXTRA HELP 45,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 429,343
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 257,047
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 8,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 40,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,979,261

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - OFFICE OF THE STATE GEOLOGIST - MAP RESALE
PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy and
Environment, to be payable from the Geology Map Resale Revolving Fund, for
operating expenses of the Department of Energy and Environment - Office of
the State Geologist - Map Resale Program for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) RESALE REVOLVING FUND $49,000

SECTION 10. REGULAR SALARIES - OFFICE OF THE STATE GEOLOGIST - STATE
GEOLOGIC MAPPING PROGRAM. There is hereby established for the Department of
Energy and Environment - Office of the State Geologist - State Geologic
Mapping Program for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number
of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
01/06/2025 4:25:23 PM WFP011

HB1087
(1) B051C GEOLOGIST 1 GRADE GS07
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 1

SECTION 11. EXTRA HELP - OFFICE OF THE STATE GEOLOGIST - STATE GEOLOGIC
MAPPING PROGRAM. There is hereby authorized, for the Department of Energy
and Environment - Office of the State Geologist - State Geologic Mapping
Program for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-
time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds
appropriated herein for such purposes: six (6) temporary or part-time
employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act
for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 12. APPROPRIATION - OFFICE OF THE STATE GEOLOGIST - STATE
GEOLOGIC MAPPING PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Energy and Environment, to be payable from the federal funds as designated by
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Energy and Environment - Office of the State
Geologist - State Geologic Mapping Program for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $43,660
(02) EXTRA HELP 48,779
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 21,681
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 77,742
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $191,862

SECTION 13. APPROPRIATION - OFFICE OF THE STATE GEOLOGIST - GEOLOGY
MUSEUM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy and
01/06/2025 4:25:23 PM WFP011

HB1087
Environment, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury
as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for museum expenses
of the Department of Energy and Environment - Office of the State Geologist -
Geology Museum for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MUSEUM EXPENSES $1,125

SECTION 14. REGULAR SALARIES - OFFICE OF THE STATE GEOLOGIST -
GEOLOGICAL RESEARCH - LANDSLIDE/SINKHOLE. There is hereby established for
the Department of Energy and Environment - Office of the State Geologist -
Geological Research - Landslide/Sinkhole for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) B043C PROFESSIONAL GEOLOGIST 1 GRADE GS08
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 1

SECTION 15. EXTRA HELP - OFFICE OF THE STATE GEOLOGIST - GEOLOGICAL
RESEARCH - LANDSLIDE/SINKHOLE. There is hereby authorized, for the
Department of Energy and Environment - Office of the State Geologist -
Geological Research - Landslide/Sinkhole for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as
"Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: two
(2) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to
exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or
its successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 16. APPROPRIATION - OFFICE OF THE STATE GEOLOGIST - GEOLOGICAL
RESEARCH - LANDSLIDE/SINKHOLE. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Energy and Environment, to be payable from the cash fund
deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
01/06/2025 4:25:23 PM WFP011

HB1087
the State, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of
Energy and Environment - Office of the State Geologist - Geological Research
- Landslide/Sinkhole for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $49,011
(02) EXTRA HELP 27,328
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 21,268
(04) GEOLOGICAL RESEARCH 143,762
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $241,369

SECTION 17. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 18. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 19. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
01/06/2025 4:25:23 PM WFP011

HB1087
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.






























01/06/2025 4:25:23 PM WFP011